Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 5. Aeronautics and Surface Transportation
Generally

Executive Order No. 5-1
(No. 02-92) [Vermont Rail Council.

Expired by its own terms, effective December 31, 1993.

Executive Order No. 5-2
(No. 02-94) [Reestablishment of Vermont Rail Council.

Superseded by Executive Order 08-01 (codified as Executive Order No. 5-3), dated September 13, 2001.

Executive Order No. 5-3
(No. 08-01) [Reestablishment of the Vermont Rail Council.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 13-03 (codified as Executive Order No. 5-6), dated August 5, 2003.

Executive Order No. 5-4
(No. 11-03) [Vermont Aviation Advisory Council.

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont has substantial public investment in its airports and air navigation system; and

WHEREAS, maintenance and modernization of this infrastructure continues to impose significant demands on the limited federal, state, local, and private funds available; and

WHEREAS, making sound decisions regarding investment in Vermont’s aviation infrastructure requires coordination among all parties with a stake in aviation; and

WHEREAS, the quality of decision making can be enhanced by providing a forum to bring together input and insight from a broad spectrum of the aviation community, as well as from the consumers of aviation services;

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby establish a Vermont Aviation Advisory Council and designate its membership and duties as follows:

The Council shall be composed of not more than 15 persons appointed by the Governor, plus the Vermont Secretary of Transportation or designee, who shall serve as Chair. Members may include representatives of general aviation, regional chambers of commerce,
regional planning commissions, municipal airports, the House and Senate transportation committees, airport users, and private airports. To the extent that funds permit, members shall receive reimbursement of expenses and a per
diem pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010
. The Council is authorized to obtain administrative assistance from the Vermont Agency of Transportation, and the Secretary of Transportation is directed to provide such assistance as required. The council may have
additional members, to be appointed by the Secretary of Transportation subject to the Governor’s approval, who shall not vote or receive expense reimbursement or per diem but who may otherwise participate in Council business and
assist in the Council’s efforts.

The Council shall meet no less than four times a year, excluding meetings of subcommittees. By December 31st of each year, the Council shall make a report of its activities, findings and recommendations to the Governor.

The Council is charged with the following responsibilities:

A.
Recommending an aviation policy for Vermont;

B.
Recommending an investment program for Vermont airports;

C.
Recommending airport classifications;

D.
Recommending air project priorities;

E.
Recommending actions to enhance the linkage between Vermont’s aviation industry and the State’s economic vitality;

F.
Serving as a forum for aviation-related issues, including policy makers, aviation industry representatives, airport users, and others; and

G.
Encouraging cooperative relationships between the Agency of Transportation and airport business operators.

The terms of the members of the Council, other than the term of the Vermont Secretary of Transportation, shall be as follows: initially, not more than seven members appointed for one year and not more than eight members appointed for two years; all subsequent
appointments (except those to the unexpired term of a former member) shall be for a period of two years.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated August 5, 2003.

Executive Order No. 5-5
(No. 12-03) [Vermont Transportation Operations Council.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-50 (codified as Executive Order 10-09), dated December 23, 2009.

Executive Order No. 5-6
(No. 13-03) [Vermont Rail Advisory Council.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 5-7 (codified as Executive Order No. 13-11), dated October 20, 2011.

Executive Order No. 5-7
(No. 13-11) [Vermont Rail Advisory Council.

WHEREAS, Vermont has more than 700 miles of railroad trackage, much of which is underutilized at present; and

WHEREAS, rail transportation is the most energy-saving and cost-efficient, and climate-friendly mode of transportation, particularly for certain categories of freight traffic; and

WHEREAS, passenger rail service, appropriately planned, operated and marketed, provides an added modal option to Vermont residents and visitors, offering benefits to tourism and other segments of the Vermont economy; and

WHEREAS, investment of federal and state funds in Vermont’s railroad infrastructure should be based on realistic planning and analysis; and

WHEREAS, the quality of decision making can be enhanced by providing a forum to bring together input and insight from many sectors of the Vermont economy, both private and public;

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby establish the Vermont Rail Advisory Council and designate its membership and duties as follows:

The Council shall be composed of not more than 15 persons appointed by the Governor, plus the Vermont Secretary of Transportation (or his/her designee from within the Agency of Transportation), who shall serve as Chair. Members may include representatives
of privately owned railroads, designated operators on state-owned railroads, freight shippers, environmental and economic development organizations, regional chambers of commerce, regional planning commissions, the House and Senate
transportation committees, travel and recreation organizations, and others whose knowledge and expertise may be deemed beneficial to the State’s efforts to encourage rail use and development. To the extent that funds permit, members
shall receive reimbursement of expenses and a per diem pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010
. The Council is authorized to obtain administrative assistance from the Vermont Agency of Transportation, and the Secretary of Transportation is directed to provide such assistance as required. The council may have
additional members, to be appointed by the Secretary of Transportation subject to the Governor’s approval, who shall not vote or receive expense reimbursement or per diem but who may otherwise participate in Council business and
assist in the Council’s efforts.

The Council shall meet no less than four times a year, excluding meetings of subcommittees. By December 31st of each year, the Council shall make a report of its activities, findings and recommendations to the Governor.

The Council is charged with the following responsibilities:

A.
The Council shall serve as an advisory group to the Agency of Transportation and to any consultants working for the Agency on statewide rail issues;

B.
Working with the Agency of Transportation and affected railroads, the Council shall examine what steps state government can take to enhance rail freight service, both as such service relates to economic development
and to relieving the burden of heavy truck traffic on Vermont highways;

C.
The Council shall examine existing rail passenger services in Vermont, including possible extension, consolidation, enhancement, or rerouting of such services;

D.
Working with the Agency of Transportation, affected municipalities, regional planning and development agencies, railroad owners/operators, and the travel industry, the Council shall examine the availability of
attractive passenger station facilities, including availability of parking, public transportation and taxi services.

E.
The Council shall serve as a forum for those interested in rail-related issues, including policy makers, municipalities, regional planning and economic development organizations, rail operators, rail shippers,
rail passengers, and others; and

F.
The Council shall encourage cooperative relationships between the Agency of Transportation and rail operators.

The terms of the members of the Council shall be for a period of two years, and appointments made and terms established pursuant to the predecessor executive order shall remain in place pursuant to this superseding executive order.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and supersedes Executive Order 13-03 (codified as Executive Order No. 5-6).

Dated October 20, 2011.